District of Columbia statutes.
2-1713

Civil enforcement.

The Corporation Counsel is authorized to initiate a civil action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or any court of competent jurisdiction to protect the interests of the District of Columbia in any public record.

Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-19, § 15, 32 DCR 3590
1981 Ed., § 1-2913.